oto.twol
Alphabet
a b c d e ë ę g h i j m n ñ o ö  p q r s t  u ų w

%{aniñ%}:0

%>:0

;

Sets

Vow = a e i o u ö ų ë ę ;

Rules
"Aniñamiento ts (ch) t"
t:c <=>   _ s: Vow: %>: %{aniñ%}:;

"Aniñamiento ts (ch) h"
s:h <=>   t:c _ Vow: %>: %{aniñ%}: ;

! a > b u ę t s u > {aniñ}
! a 0 b u ę c h u 0  0
